Utah statutes.
78A-6-119.   Modification of order or decree -- Requirements for changing or terminating custody, probation, or protective supervision.

(1)  The court may modify or set aside any order or decree made by it, however a modification of an order placing a minor on probation may not be made upon an alleged violation of the terms of probation unless there has been a hearing in accordance with the procedures in Section 78A-6-1103.

(2)  Notice of the hearing shall be required in any case in which the effect of modifying or setting aside an order or decree may be to make any change in the minor's legal custody.

(3) (a)  Notice of an order terminating probation or protective supervision of a child shall be given to the child's:

(i)  parents;

(ii)  guardian;

(iii)  custodian; and

(iv)  where appropriate, to the child.

(b)  Notice of an order terminating probation or protective supervision of a minor who is at least 18 years of age shall be given to the minor.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

